Kentucky statutes. TITLE V Military Affairs
Homeless Veterans

40.340.
Kentucky Homeless Veterans Program — Homeless Veterans Service Coordinating Committee.

The Kentucky Homeless Veterans Program is hereby created in the Kentucky Department of Veterans’ Affairs and shall be attached to the office of the commissioner for administrative purposes. The program shall develop a statewide network of:

Services that provide treatment for addictions, including but not limited to alcohol, drug use, and gambling;

Services that lead to permanent housing;

Services that lead to employment; and

Concerned citizens and nonprofit agencies that provide shelter.

The mission of the Kentucky Homeless Veterans Program shall be to work toward the elimination of homelessness and the prevention of the threat of homelessness and its causes in the veteran population of the Commonwealth.

The program shall provide assistance to persons who served in the United States Armed Forces or in forces incorporated as part of the United States Armed Forces, and who were discharged under conditions other than dishonorable.

The program shall provide assistance to persons whose need for services is based upon homelessness, or other circumstances as prescribed by administrative regulations promulgated by the department.

The primary components of the program shall be:

Advocacy and public awareness. The program shall be an advocate for homeless veterans, and work to increase public awareness about the issue of homelessness among veterans and its root causes. The program shall advocate legislation and policies on the local, state, and national level to address these issues;

Information services. The program shall monitor and research issues relating to homeless veterans and disseminate information and opportunities throughout its network;

Technical assistance. The program, through conferences and training workshops with federal and state agencies, shall provide guidance and direction in applying for grants and benefits for homeless veterans. The program shall provide peer-to-peer consulting and on-site technical support; and

Facilities. The program, through grants and other sources of funding, shall provide facilities as appropriate in support of the program.

A Homeless Veterans Service Coordinating Committee shall be established. The committee’s membership shall be comprised of representatives of public and private agencies who provide services that may be used by homeless veterans. The commissioner of the Department of Veterans’ Affairs shall designate the agencies represented on the committee. The committee shall discuss and research ways in which the services that it offers can be made more easily available and better focused to serve homeless veterans.

The program is authorized to accept and expend moneys as may be appropriated from time to time by the General Assembly, and any moneys that may be received from any source including donations and grants.

History.

Enact. Acts 2000, ch. 98, § 1, effective July 14, 2000.

40.345.
Private employer may have voluntary veterans’ preference employment policy — Registry of employers — Administrative regulations.

The following definitions apply in this section unless context otherwise requires:

“Private employer” means a sole proprietor, corporation, partnership, limited liability company, or other entity with one (1) or more employees and excludes the state, a municipality, county, school district, or public institution of higher education; and

“Veterans’ preference employment policy” means a private employer’s voluntary preference for hiring, promoting, or retaining a veteran over another qualified applicant or employee.

A private employer may have a voluntary veterans’ preference employment policy. The veterans’ preference employment policy shall be in writing and applied uniformly to employment decisions regarding hiring, promotion, or retention during a reduction in workforce. The private employer may require the veteran to submit a Department of Defense form DD 214 as proof of eligibility for the veterans’ preference employment policy. Granting preference under this section does not violate any local or state equal employment opportunity law, including but not limited to KRS Chapter 344.

The Department of Veterans’ Affairs and the Education and Labor Cabinet may assist a private employer in determining the veteran’s status as an applicant. The Education and Labor Cabinet may maintain an online registry of employers that have a voluntary veterans’ preference employment policy as described in this section and may promulgate administrative regulations to assist in the creation of this policy.

HISTORY:

2015 ch. 104, § 1, effective June 24, 2015; 2022 ch. 236, § 16, effective July 1, 2022.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(6/24/2015).
2015 Ky. Acts ch. 104, sec. 2 provides that this statute created in
2015 Ky. Acts ch. 104, sec. 1 may be cited as the “Voluntary Veterans' Preference Employment Policy Act.”